Utah statutes.
59-12-1904.   Seller or certified service provider reliance on commission
information.
A seller or certified service provider is not liable for failing to collect a
tax at a tax rate imposed under this part if the seller's or certified service
provider's failure to collect the tax is as a result of the seller's or
certified service provider's reliance on incorrect data provided by the
commission in a database created by the commission:
(1)  containing tax rates, boundaries, or local taxing jurisdiction
assignments; or
(2)  indicating the taxability of tangible personal property, a product
transferred electronically, or a service.
